FST Assignment 2/sources/cat5.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+Noun +Masculine +Nominative +Accusative +NominativeOrAccusative +Singular +Plural +Definite +Indefinite

LEXICON Root
	kolu		Noun1;
	kUdælu		Noun1;
	wasu		Noun1;
	wævi		Noun1;
	ibi			Noun1;

LEXICON Noun1
	+Noun+Masculine:0	Noun2;
	
LEXICON Noun2
	+NominativeOrAccusative+Singular+Definite:A	#;
	+Nominative+Singular+Indefinite:ek		#;
	+Nominative+Plural:O				#;
	+Accusative+Plural:an			#;
